District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Helping Incentivize Returning Citizen Employment (HIRE) Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“§ 47-1807.16. Reentry Employment Incentive Program.”.
(b) A new section 47-1807.16 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1807.16. Reentry Employment Incentive Program.
“(a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there shall be allowed a credit

against the tax imposed by this chapter for each qualifying employee of the taxpayer for which
the taxpayer is allowed a deduction under section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(b)(1) The amount of the credit shall be calculated as follows:
“(A) For the taxable year beginning January 1, 2026, $5,000 annually for
each Qualifying Employee employed in a Qualifying Position who has continuously resided in
the District since release from incarceration or for the twelve months immediately preceding
employment in a Qualifying Position; and
“(B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, $5,000 for
each Qualifying Employee employed in a Qualifying Position who has continuously resided in
the District since release from incarceration or for the twelve months immediately preceding
employment in a Qualifying Position, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of-living
adjustment.
“(2) In the case of a return made for a fractional part of a taxable year, the credit
allowable under this section shall be reduced to an amount that bears the same ratio to the full
credit provided as the number of months in the period for which the return is made to 12 months.
“(3) A Qualifying Employer shall sign a Re-entry Employment Incentive
Agreement ("Agreement") approved by the Department of Employment Services, the Office of
the Attorney General, and the Office of the Chief Financial Officer prior to becoming eligible for
tax credits under this section. The Agreement shall:
“(A) Set forth the terms and conditions of eligibility and
“(B) Be re-submitted annually for approval as a condition for continued
eligibility.
“(c) A Qualifying Employer shall become eligible for a credit for each Qualifying

Position after the Qualifying Employee has completed a probationary period of ninety (90) days
of employment.
“(d) The credits distributed under this section shall be subject to the availability and
allocation of funds in the District budget.
“(e) The district shall supply the qualifying employer with a list annually of resources for
employment and job training support services for returning citizens hired under this bill.
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) Qualifying Employee" means a District resident who:
“(A) Has been incarcerated for a cumulative period of six (6) months or
more during the five (5) years preceding employment in a Qualifying Position;
“(B) Has been released from incarceration within the three (3) years
preceding employment in a Qualifying Position;
“(C) Was domiciled in the District prior to their most recent period of
incarceration;
“(D) Has continuously resided in the District since release from
incarceration or for the twelve months immediately preceding employment in a Qualifying
Position.
“(2) "Qualifying Employer" means a commercial or nonprofit business entity
that:
“(A) Conducts business within the District of Columbia and complies
with all applicable federal and local laws;
“(B) Employs a Qualifying Employee in a Qualifying Position; and

“(C) Has signed and complied with a Re-entry Employment Incentive
Agreement in accordance with subsection (b)(3) of this section.
“(3) "Qualifying Position" means a position located within the District for which
the employer is required to pay D.C. unemployment insurance tax and in which a Qualifying
Employee:
“(A) Works a minimum of 20 hours per week;
“(B) Earns at least the District's minimum wage sufficient to provide adequate
maintenance and to protect health as referenced in Title 32 Chapter 10 (§ 32–1001 et seq) of the
D.C. Official Code; and
“(C) Is employed by a Qualifying Employer after the Qualifying Employer has
signed a Re-entry Employment Incentive Agreement.
“(4) "Incarceration" means detention in a correctional facility, home detention,
or under electronic monitoring following a criminal conviction.”.
Sec. 3. Rulemaking.
(a) The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section, including
rules addressing:
(1) Procedures for the distribution of funds under this Program;
(2) Requirements for reporting and oversight of Qualifying Employers; and
(3) Criteria for prioritizing reimbursements if Program funds are insufficient to
cover all eligible requests
100 (b) The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review,
101 excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not
102 approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 45-day review period, the

103 proposed rules shall be deemed approved.
104 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
105 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
106 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
107 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
108 Sec. 5. Effective date.
109 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
110 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
111 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
112 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
113 Columbia Register.